District of Columbia statutes.
6-731.04

Penalty.

Any person violating § 6-731.01 shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 days, fined not more than $300, or both.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-129, § 5, 23 DCR 9693
1981 Ed., § 5-528.
1973 Ed., § 5-327.